Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2019 Act is added to and made a part  of ORS 320.345 to
320.350.
SECTION 2. (1) The Department of Revenue  shall collect the local transient lodging taxes
that the department  collects for units of local government, pursuant to agreements entered
into under ORS 305.620, on a local level rather than a regional level.
(2) The department shall adopt rules for purposes of implementing this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 320.335, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2019, in
order to fund the actual start-up costs incurred by the Department of Revenue in  collecting
local transient lodging taxes in the manner described in section 2 of this 2019 Act, the  de-
partment shall withhold state transient lodging tax moneys that would  otherwise be trans-
ferred to the  Oregon Tourism Commission under ORS 320.335 (2) in an amount not to exceed
$900,000.
(2)(a) In order to reimburse the commission for the moneys  withheld under subsection
(1) of this section, plus two percent interest per annum, the  department shall transfer to the
commission, in addition to the  transfers required under ORS 320.335 (2), the amount of state
and local transient  lodging tax moneys received by the department that would have been
withheld by transient lodging intermediaries as a collection reimbursement  charge under
ORS 320.305 (2) and 320.345 but for the disallowance of such charges under paragraph  (b) of
this subsection.
(b) Notwithstanding ORS  320.305 (2) and 320.345, a transient lodging intermediary may
not withhold any amount of state or local  transient lodging taxes reported to the department
as a collection reimbursement charge until the date specified in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Beginning on the  day immediately following the date on which the department has
withheld the lesser of the actual start-up costs described in subsection (1) of this section  or
$900,000, the department shall cease  withholding moneys in the manner described in sub-
section (1) of this section.
(4) Beginning on the day immediately following the date on which  the department has
transferred to the commission the total amount of  the reimbursement required under sub-
section (2)(a) of this section, transient lodging intermediaries may resume withholding col-
lection reimbursement  charges from state and local transient lodging taxes reported to the
department as provided in ORS 320.305 (2) and 320.345.
Enrolled House Bill 3136 (HB 3136-B) Page 1
(5)(a) The department shall refund,  without interest, any amounts of state and local
transient lodging taxes received from transient lodging intermediaries  pursuant to sub-
section (2)(a) of this section that exceed the  total amount of the reimbursement required
under subsection (2)(a) of this section.
(b) The refunds required by paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be made in fair  and
proportionate amounts to transient lodging intermediaries that would have withheld amounts
of state and local transient lodging taxes as a  collection reimbursement charge but for the
disallowance of such charges under subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(c) The department may prescribe the method for making any determination  required
under this subsection.
(6) As used in this section, “collection reimbursement charge,” “local transient  lodging
tax,” “state transient lodging tax”  and “transient lodging intermediary” have the meanings
given those terms in ORS 320.300.
SECTION 4.
(1) Section 3 of this 2019 Act is repealed on the day immediately  following
the day described in section 3 (4) of this 2019 Act.
(2) The Department  of Revenue shall notify the Legislative Counsel as soon as practicable
after the day described in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 5. (1) For  the purpose of enforcing the state transient lodging tax, the De-
partment of Revenue shall purchase access to raw metadata scraped from the Internet that
relates to the sale, service or furnishing of transient lodging.
(2)(a) The department shall implement an enhanced data-scraping pilot  program for the
purpose of enforcing the state and local transient lodging taxes.
(b) The pilot program shall include at least two and not more than four units  of local
government for which the department enforces the local transient lodging tax  pursuant to
agreements entered into under ORS 305.620.
(c) The department shall prescribe the data that may be  made available to the units of
local government.
(d) ORS 305.620 (5) does not apply to costs related to the pilot  program incurred by the
department.
(3) As used in  this section, “local transient lodging tax,” “state transient lodging tax”
and “unit of local government” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 320.300.
SECTION 6.
Section 5 of this 2019 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (4), chapter , Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House
Bill 5033),  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and re-
imbursements from federal service  agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds
not described in this  section, collected or received by the Department of Revenue, is in-
creased by $158,533 for implementation of this 2019 Act by the Business Division.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (10), chapter , Oregon Laws  2019 (Enrolled House
Bill 5033), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of
expenses from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and re-
imbursements from federal service  agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds
not described in this section, collected or received by the Department of  Revenue, is in-
creased by $416,000 for the core systems replacement for implementation of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 9. This 2019 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 3136 (HB 3136-B) Page 2
Passed by House June 24, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3136 (HB 3136-B) Page 3